Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1592
Agency representatives; exempt from licensing requirements; when.

All representatives of a local housing agency, acting within the scope of carrying out the business and conducting the affairs of a local housing agency, shall be exempt from all licensing requirements imposed by any law with respect to the sale, rental, or management of real property or the improvement or development thereof, including requirements imposing any fee or charge.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 21.